Georgia, session 2025_26, SB252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 37 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to acquisition and
disposition of real and personal property generally, is amended by revising Code Section
36-37-6.1, relating to sale, exchange, lease, or grant of easement over property used for
recreational purposes by incorporated municipalities having population greater than 300,000,
as follows:
"36-37-6.1.
(a) This Code section shall be applicable to incorporated municipalities of the State of
Georgia having a population of more than 300,000 according to the United States decennial
census of 1960 or any future such census.
S. B. 252
- 1 -

LC 44 3028
(b) All such municipalities shall have authority to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of
any real or personal property comprising parks, playgrounds, golf courses, swimming
pools, or other like property used primarily for recreational purposes, provided that nothing
in this Code section shall have the effect of authorizing alienation where such would be in
derogation of rights, duties, and obligations imposed by prior deed, contract, or like
document of similar import or where such alienation would cause divesting of title to a
park, playground, golf course, swimming pool, or other like property that had been
dedicated to public use and not subsequently abandoned.
(c)(1) All such municipalities shall have authority to lease out and grant easements over
property used primarily for recreational purposes to others consistent with general park
and recreational purposes for a period not exceeding 50 years and for a valuable
consideration. Any such recreational property which was formerly used for annual
regional fair purposes but is no longer so used may be leased by any such municipality
to one or more private entities for terms of not more than 50 years each for development
and use as motion picture and television production, processing, and related facilities
together with all such support and service facilities as are necessary or convenient to such
use.
(2) All such municipalities shall have authority to enter into contracts and renewals and
extensions of contracts for the cooperative operation, maintenance, cooperative
management, and funding of property which in no way limits the governance or the
policy role of said municipalities which property is used primarily for recreational
purposes consistent with general park and recreational purposes, for periods not
exceeding ten years and for a valuable consideration.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, all such
municipalities shall have authority to lease out, grant easements over, or convey any
property described in subsection (b) of this Code section to an independent school system
operating in such municipality for a valuable consideration where the governing authority
S. B. 252
- 2 -

LC 44 3028
of such municipality and the board of such independent school system determine that
such lease, easement, or conveyance is in the best interest of their respective jurisdictions.
If such property is conveyed, the governing authority of such municipality shall
subsequently replace such property with one or more properties which are determined by
such governing authority to be, in the aggregate, of substantially equivalent benefit to the
citizens of such municipality, taking into consideration the prevailing uses and needs of
such municipality. One or more independent conveyances of property as may be agreed
upon by such municipality and independent school system for the public uses set forth
in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be credited against the replacement property
required by this paragraph for any subsequent conveyance of property described in
subsection (b) of this Code section by the municipality to the independent school system."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 252
- 3 -